Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4625.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 118. (1) No A household domestic servant shall be is not considered an employee if the person household domestic servant is a wife, spouse, child, or other member of the employer's family residing in the home, and no a householder shall be deemed is not considered a statutory principal within the meaning of section 171 for the purposes of this section. (2) No A private employer shall be is not liable under this act to any person individual who is employed by him the private employer as a household domestic servant for less than 35 hours per week for 13 weeks or longer during the preceding 52 weeks, notwithstanding the provisions of section 611 or any other provision of this act, unless such person assume the private employer assumes liability under section 121. (3) A As used in this act, "household domestic servant" or "domestic" as used in this act means a person an individual who engages in work or activity relating to the operation of a household and its surroundings whether or not he the individual resides therein.in the household or its surroundings. Sec. 335. (1) Upon the remarriage of a dependent wife spouse receiving compensation, such compensation payments shall cease upon the payment to her the spouse of the balance of the compensation to which she the spouse would otherwise have been entitled but not to exceed the sum of $500.00, and further compensation, if any, shall be is payable to the person individual either wholly or partially dependent upon on the deceased for support at his the time of the decedent's death as provided in section 331(b). 331. A worker's compensation magistrate shall determine the amount of compensation or portion thereof of compensation that shall be is payable weekly to such the wholly or partially dependent person individual for the remaining weeks of compensation. Where, If, at the expiration of the 500-week period, any such the wholly or partially dependent person individual is less younger than 18 years of age, a worker's compensation magistrate may order the employer to continue to pay the weekly compensation, or some portion thereof, of the weekly compensation, until such the wholly or partially dependent person individual reaches the age of 18 years of age. The payment of compensation to any dependent child shall cease ceases when the child reaches the age of 18 years of age, if at the age of 18 years he or she the child is neither physically nor mentally incapacitated from earning, or when the child reaches the age of 16 years of age and thereafter is self-supporting for 6 months. If the child ceases to be self-supporting thereafter, the dependency shall must be reinstated. Such The remaining compensation, if any, shall be is payable to the person individual either wholly or partially dependent upon on the deceased employee for support at the time of the employee's death, as provided in the case of the remarriage of a dependent wife.spouse. (2) This section shall apply applies to all persons individuals who are entitled to receive compensation or are receiving compensation under this act on July 30, 1985 and who have not attained reached the age of 18 years on July 30, 1985. Sec. 353. (1) For the purposes of sections 351 to 361, dependency shall must be determined as follows: (a) A child under the age of 16 years, or 16 years or over older if physically or mentally incapacitated from earning, living with his the child's parent at the time of the injury of that parent. (b) In all other cases, questions of dependency shall must be determined in accordance with the facts at the time of the injury, except as provided in subsection (3). A person shall An individual is not be considered a dependent unless he or she the individual is a member of the family of the injured employee, or unless the person individual bears to the injured employee the relation of husband or wife, spouse, or lineal descendent, or ancestor or brother or sister. sibling. Except as to a person an individual conclusively presumed to be a dependent, a person an individual who receives less than 1/2 of his or her the individual's support from an injured employee shall is not be considered to be a dependent. (2) Weekly payments to an injured employee shall must be reduced by the additional amount provided for any dependent child or spouse or other dependent when the child either reaches the age of 18 years or after becoming 16 ceases for a period of 6 months to receive more than 1/2 of his or her the child's support from the injured employee, if at that time the child is neither physically nor mentally incapacitated from earning, ; when the spouse is divorced by final decree from his or her the spouse's injured spouse, ; or when the child, spouse, or other dependent is deceased. (3) An increase in payments shall must be made for increased numbers of conclusive dependents as defined in this act who were not dependent at the time of the injury of an employee. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.